Indiana, session 2026, HB1399.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 10-11-13.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 13.2. Electronic Logging System
Sec. 1. (a) The department shall oversee an electronic logging
system to:
(1) record and monitor real time purchases of products
containing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine;
(2) monitor the purchases described in subdivision (1) in
order to prevent or investigate the illegal purchase of
ephedrine or pseudoephedrine; and
(3) block illegal purchases of ephedrine and pseudoephedrine.
(b) The department shall contract with a third party vendor to
operate the electronic logging system.
(c) By September 1 of each year, each manufacturer of products
that contain ephedrine and pseudoephedrine must demonstrate to
the department that they have a valid contract with the vendor
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


described in subsection (b) to provide electronic tracking of
purchases in Indiana.
(d) The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
administer this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 25-26-13-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.93-2024,
SECTION 186, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The board may:
(1) adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 for implementing and enforcing
this chapter;
(2) establish requirements and tests to determine the moral,
physical, intellectual, educational, scientific, technical, and
professional qualifications for applicants for pharmacists'
licenses;
(3) refuse to issue, deny, suspend, or revoke a license or permit or
place on probation or fine any licensee or permittee under this
chapter;
(4) regulate the sale of drugs and devices in the state of Indiana;
(5) impound, embargo, confiscate, or otherwise prevent from
disposition any drugs, medicines, chemicals, poisons, or devices
which by inspection are deemed unfit for use or would be
dangerous to the health and welfare of the citizens of the state of
Indiana; the board shall follow those embargo procedures found
in IC 16-42-1-18 through IC 16-42-1-31, and persons may not
refuse to permit or otherwise prevent members of the board or
their representatives from entering such places and making such
inspections;
(6) prescribe minimum standards with respect to physical
characteristics of pharmacies, as may be necessary to the
maintenance of professional surroundings and to the protection of
the safety and welfare of the public;
(7) subject to IC 25-1-7, investigate complaints, subpoena
witnesses, schedule and conduct hearings on behalf of the public
interest on any matter under the jurisdiction of the board;
(8) prescribe the time, place, method, manner, scope, and subjects
of licensing examinations which shall be given at least twice
annually; and
(9) perform such other duties and functions and exercise such
other powers as may be necessary to implement and enforce this
chapter.
(b) The board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 for the following:
(1) Establishing standards for the competent practice of
pharmacy.
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


(2) Establishing the standards for a pharmacist to counsel
individuals regarding the proper use of drugs.
(3) Establishing standards and procedures before January 1, 2006,
to ensure that a pharmacist:
(A) has entered into a contract that accepts the return of
expired drugs with; or
(B) is subject to a policy that accepts the return of expired
drugs of;
a wholesaler, manufacturer, or agent of a wholesaler or
manufacturer concerning the return by the pharmacist to the
wholesaler, the manufacturer, or the agent of expired legend drugs
or controlled drugs. In determining the standards and procedures,
the board may not interfere with negotiated terms related to cost,
expenses, or reimbursement charges contained in contracts
between parties, but may consider what is a reasonable quantity
of a drug to be purchased by a pharmacy. The standards and
procedures do not apply to vaccines that prevent influenza,
medicine used for the treatment of malignant hyperthermia, and
other drugs determined by the board to not be subject to a return
policy. An agent of a wholesaler or manufacturer must be
appointed in writing and have policies, personnel, and facilities
to handle properly returns of expired legend drugs and controlled
substances.
(c) The board may grant or deny a temporary variance to a rule it
has adopted if:
(1) the board has adopted rules which set forth the procedures and
standards governing the grant or denial of a temporary variance;
and
(2) the board sets forth in writing the reasons for a grant or denial
of a temporary variance.
(d) The board shall adopt rules and procedures, in consultation with
the medical licensing board, concerning the electronic transmission of
prescriptions. The rules adopted under this subsection must address the
following:
(1) Privacy protection for the practitioner and the practitioner's
patient.
(2) Security of the electronic transmission.
(3) A process for approving electronic data intermediaries for the
electronic transmission of prescriptions.
(4) Use of a practitioner's United States Drug Enforcement
Agency registration number.
(5) Protection of the practitioner from identity theft or fraudulent
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


use of the practitioner's prescribing authority.
(e) The governor may direct the board to develop:
(1) a prescription drug program that includes the establishment of
criteria to eliminate or significantly reduce prescription fraud; and
(2) a standard format for an official tamper resistant prescription
drug form for prescriptions (as defined in IC 16-42-19-7(1)).
The board may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 necessary to implement
this subsection.
(f) The standard format for a prescription drug form described in
subsection (e)(2) must include the following:
(1) A counterfeit protection bar code with human readable
representation of the data in the bar code.
(2) A thermochromic mark on the front and the back of the
prescription that:
(A) is at least one-fourth (1/4) of one (1) inch in height and
width; and
(B) changes from blue to clear when exposed to heat.
(g) The board may contract with a supplier to implement and
manage the prescription drug program described in subsection (e). The
supplier must:
(1) have been audited by a third party auditor using the SAS 70
audit or an equivalent audit for at least the three (3) previous
years; and
(2) be audited by a third party auditor using the SAS 70 audit or
an equivalent audit throughout the duration of the contract;
in order to be considered to implement and manage the program.
(h) The board shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 concerning:
(1) professional determinations made under IC 35-48-4-14.7(d);
and
(2) the determination of a relationship on record with the
pharmacy under IC 35-48-4-14.7.
(i) The board may:
(1) review professional determinations made by a pharmacist; and
(2) take appropriate disciplinary action against a pharmacist who
violates a rule adopted under subsection (h) concerning a
professional determination made;
under IC 35-48-4-14.7 concerning the sale of ephedrine and
pseudoephedrine.
SECTION 3. IC 33-23-1-9.7 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 9.7. "NPLEx" refers to the National Precursor Log
Exchange.
SECTION 4. IC 33-24-6-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.77-2025,
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


SECTION 10, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The office of judicial administration shall
do the following:
(1) Examine the administrative and business methods and systems
employed in the offices of the clerks of court and other offices
related to and serving the courts and make recommendations for
necessary improvement.
(2) Collect and compile statistical data and other information on
the judicial work of the courts in Indiana. All justices of the
supreme court, judges of the court of appeals, judges of all trial
courts, and any city or town courts, whether having general or
special jurisdiction, court clerks, court reporters, and other
officers and employees of the courts shall, upon notice by the
chief administrative officer and in compliance with procedures
prescribed by the chief administrative officer, furnish the chief
administrative officer the information as is requested concerning
the nature and volume of judicial business. The information must
include the following:
(A) The volume, condition, and type of business conducted by
the courts.
(B) The methods of procedure in the courts.
(C) The work accomplished by the courts.
(D) The receipt and expenditure of public money by and for
the operation of the courts.
(E) The methods of disposition or termination of cases.
(3) Prepare and publish reports, not less than one (1) or more than
two (2) times per year, on the nature and volume of judicial work
performed by the courts as determined by the information
required in subdivision (2).
(4) Serve the judicial nominating commission and the judicial
qualifications commission in the performance by the commissions
of their statutory and constitutional functions.
(5) Administer the civil legal aid fund as required by IC 33-24-12.
(6) Administer the court technology fund established by section
12 of this chapter.
(7) By December 31, 2013, develop and implement a standard
protocol for sending and receiving court data:
(A) between the protective order registry, established by
IC 5-2-9-5.5, and county court case management systems;
(B) at the option of the prosecuting attorney, for:
(i) a prosecuting attorney's case management system;
(ii) a county court case management system; and
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


(iii) a county court case management system developed and
operated by the office of judicial administration;
to interface with the electronic traffic tickets, as defined by
IC 9-30-3-2.5; and
(C) between county court case management systems and the
case management system developed and operated by the office
of judicial administration.
The standard protocol developed and implemented under this
subdivision shall permit private sector vendors, including vendors
providing service to a local system and vendors accessing the
system for information, to send and receive court information on
an equitable basis and at an equitable cost, and for a case
management system developed and operated by the office of
judicial administration, must include a searchable field for the
name and bail agent license number, if applicable, of the bail
agent or a person authorized by the surety that pays bail for an
individual as described in IC 35-33-8-3.2.
(8) Establish and administer an electronic system for receiving
information that relates to certain individuals who may be
prohibited from possessing a firearm for the purpose of:
(A) transmitting this information to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for inclusion in the NICS; and
(B) beginning July 1, 2021, compiling and publishing certain
statistics related to the confiscation and retention of firearms
as described under section 14 of this chapter.
(9) Establish and administer an electronic system for receiving
drug related felony conviction information from courts. The office
of judicial administration shall notify NPLEx the state police
department of each drug related felony entered after June 30,
2012, and do the following:
(A) Provide NPLEx the state police department with the
following information:
(i) The convicted individual's full name.
(ii) The convicted individual's date of birth.
(iii) The convicted individual's driver's license number, state
personal identification number, or other unique number, if
available.
(iv) The date the individual was convicted of the felony.
Upon receipt of the information from the office of judicial
administration, a stop sale alert must be generated through
NPLEx the state police department's electronic logging
system under IC 10-11-13.2 for each individual reported
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


under this clause.
(B) Notify NPLEx the state police department if the felony
of an individual reported under clause (A) has been:
(i) set aside;
(ii) reversed;
(iii) expunged; or
(iv) vacated.
Upon receipt of information under this clause, NPLEx the
state police department shall remove the stop sale alert
issued under clause (A) for the individual in the electronic
logging system under IC 10-11-13.2.
(10) After July 1, 2018, establish and administer an electronic
system for receiving from courts felony or misdemeanor
conviction information for each felony or misdemeanor described
in IC 20-28-5-8(c). The office of judicial administration shall
notify the department of education at least one (1) time each week
of each felony or misdemeanor described in IC 20-28-5-8(c)
entered after July 1, 2018, and do the following:
(A) Provide the department of education with the following
information:
(i) The convicted individual's full name.
(ii) The convicted individual's date of birth.
(iii) The convicted individual's driver's license number, state
personal identification number, or other unique number, if
available.
(iv) The date the individual was convicted of the felony or
misdemeanor.
(B) Notify the department of education if the felony or
misdemeanor of an individual reported under clause (A) has
been:
(i) set aside;
(ii) reversed; or
(iii) vacated.
(11) Perform legal and administrative duties for the justices as
determined by the justices.
(12) Provide staff support for the judicial conference of Indiana
established in IC 33-38-9.
(13) Work with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs
to identify and address the needs of veterans in the court system.
(14) If necessary for purposes of IC 35-47-16-1, issue a retired
judicial officer an identification card identifying the retired
judicial officer as a retired judicial officer.
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


(15) Establish and administer the statewide juvenile justice data
aggregation plan established under section 12.5 of this chapter.
(16) Create and make available an application for detention to be
used in proceedings under IC 12-26-5 (mental health detention,
commitment, and treatment).
(17) Create and make available a uniform form to assist a court in
making an indigency determination under IC 35-33-7-6.5.
(18) Before July 1, 2025, establish and administer an electronic
system for:
(A) receiving a request for a chronological case summary
from; and
(B) transmitting a chronological case summary to;
the state police department for purposes of expungement or
sealing of records.
(b) All forms to be used in gathering data must be approved by the
supreme court and shall be distributed to all judges and clerks before
the start of each period for which reports are required.
(c) The office of judicial administration may adopt rules to
implement this section.
SECTION 5. IC 34-30-2.1-569, AS ADDED BY P.L.105-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 569. IC 35-48-4-14.7(d) (Concerning a pharmacy
or NPLEx covered retailer that discloses information concerning the
sale of a product containing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine).
SECTION 6. IC 34-30-2.1-570 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]. Sec. 570. IC 35-48-4-14.7(d)(3) (Concerning a pharmacist's
professional judgment not to sell ephedrine or pseudoephedrine to an
individual).
SECTION 7. IC 34-30-2.1-571, AS ADDED BY P.L.105-2022,
SECTION 12, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 571. IC 35-48-4-14.7(k) IC 35-48-4-14.7(j)
(Concerning a pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer that discloses
information concerning the sale of a product containing ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine).
SECTION 8. IC 35-31.5-2-111.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 111.2. "Electronic logging
system", for purposes of IC 35-48-4-14.7, has the meaning set forth
in IC 35-48-4-14.7(b).
SECTION 9. IC 35-31.5-2-120, AS ADDED BY P.L.114-2012,
SECTION 67, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 120. "Ephedrine", for purposes of
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


IC 35-48-4-14.7, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-48-4-14.7(b)(3).
IC 35-48-4-14.7(b).
SECTION 10. IC 35-48-4-14.7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.252-2017,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14.7. (a) This section does not apply to the
following:
(1) Ephedrine or pseudoephedrine dispensed pursuant to a
prescription. Nothing in this section prohibits a person who is
denied the sale of a nonprescription product containing
pseudoephedrine or ephedrine from obtaining pseudoephedrine
or ephedrine pursuant to a prescription.
(2) The sale of a drug containing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine
to a licensed health care provider, pharmacist, retail distributor,
wholesaler, manufacturer, or an agent of any of these persons if
the sale occurs in the regular course of lawful business activities.
However, a retail distributor, wholesaler, or manufacturer is
required to report a suspicious order to the state police department
in accordance with subsection (g). (f).
(3) The sale of a drug containing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine
by a person who does not sell exclusively to walk-in customers for
the personal use of the walk-in customers. However, if the person
described in this subdivision is a retail distributor, wholesaler, or
manufacturer, the person is required to report a suspicious order
to the state police department in accordance with subsection (g).
(f).
(b) The following definitions apply throughout this section:
(1) "Constant video monitoring" means the surveillance by an
automated camera that:
(A) records at least one (1) photograph or digital image every
ten (10) seconds;
(B) retains a photograph or digital image for at least
seventy-two (72) hours;
(C) has sufficient resolution and magnification to permit the
identification of a person in the area under surveillance; and
(D) stores a recorded photograph or digital image at a location
that is immediately accessible to a law enforcement officer.
(2) "Convenience package" means a package that contains a drug
having as an active ingredient not more than sixty (60) milligrams
of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine, or both.
(3) "Electronic logging system" means the system established
and operated by the state police department under
IC 10-11-13.2 for the purpose of:
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


(A) recording and monitoring the real time purchase of
products containing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine; and
(B) monitoring the information described in clause (A) to
prevent or investigate the illegal purchase of ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine.
(3) (4) "Ephedrine" means pure or adulterated ephedrine.
(4) (5) "Pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer" means:
(A) a pharmacy, as defined in IC 25-26-13-2;
(B) a retailer containing a pharmacy, as defined in
IC 25-26-13-2; or
(C) a retailer that electronically submits the required
information to the National Precursor Log Exchange (NPLEx).
state police department's logging system under
IC 10-11-13.2.
(5) (6) "Pseudoephedrine" means pure or adulterated
pseudoephedrine.
(6) (7) "Retailer" means a grocery store, general merchandise
store, or other similar establishment. The term does not include a
pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer.
(7) (8) "Suspicious order" means a sale or transfer of a drug
containing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine if the sale or transfer:
(A) is a sale or transfer that the retail distributor, wholesaler,
or manufacturer is required to report to the United States Drug
Enforcement Administration;
(B) appears suspicious to the retail distributor, wholesaler, or
manufacturer in light of the recommendations contained in
Appendix A of the report to the United States attorney general
by the suspicious orders task force under the federal
Comprehensive Methamphetamine Control Act of 1996; or
(C) is for cash or a money order in a total amount of at least
two hundred dollars ($200).
(8) (9) "Unusual theft" means the theft or unexplained
disappearance from a particular pharmacy or NPLEx covered
retailer of drugs containing ten (10) grams or more of ephedrine,
pseudoephedrine, or both in a twenty-four (24) hour period.
(c) A drug containing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine may be sold
only by a pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer.
(d) A pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer may sell a drug that
contains the active ingredient of ephedrine, pseudoephedrine, or both
only if the pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer complies with the
following conditions:
(1) The pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer does not sell the
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


drug to a person less than eighteen (18) years of age.
(2) The pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer does not sell drugs
containing more than:
(A) three and six-tenths (3.6) grams of ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine, or both, to one (1) individual on one (1) day;
(B) seven and two-tenths (7.2) grams of ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine, or both, to one (1) individual in a thirty (30)
day period; or
(C) sixty-one and two-tenths (61.2) grams of ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine, or both, to one (1) individual in a three
hundred sixty-five (365) day period.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (f), before the sale occurs the
pharmacist or the pharmacy technician (as defined by
IC 25-26-19-2) has determined that the purchaser has a
relationship on record with the pharmacy, in compliance with
rules adopted by the board under IC 25-26-13-4. If it has been
determined that the purchaser does not have a relationship on
record with the pharmacy, the pharmacist shall make a
professional determination as to whether there is a legitimate
medical or pharmaceutical need for ephedrine or pseudoephedrine
before selling ephedrine or pseudoephedrine to an individual. The
pharmacist's professional determination must comply with the
rules adopted under IC 25-26-13-4 and may include the
following:
(A) Prior medication filling history of the individual.
(B) Consulting with the individual.
(C) Other tools that provide professional reassurance to the
pharmacist that a legitimate medical or pharmaceutical need
for ephedrine or pseudoephedrine exists.
A pharmacist who in good faith does not sell ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine to an individual under this subdivision is
immune from civil liability unless the refusal to sell constitutes
gross negligence or intentional, wanton, or willful misconduct.
(4) (3) The pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer requires:
(A) the purchaser to produce a valid government issued photo
identification card showing the date of birth of the person;
(B) the purchaser to sign a written or electronic log attesting
to the validity of the information; and
(C) the clerk who is conducting the transaction to initial or
electronically record the clerk's identification on the log.
Records from the completion of a log must be retained for at least
two (2) years. A law enforcement officer has the right to inspect
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


and copy a log or the records from the completion of a log in
accordance with state and federal law. A pharmacy or NPLEx
covered retailer may not sell or release a log or the records from
the completion of a log for a commercial purpose. The Indiana
criminal justice institute may obtain information concerning a log
or the records from the completion of a log from a law
enforcement officer if the information may not be used to identify
a specific individual and is used only for statistical purposes. A
pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer that in good faith releases
information maintained under this subsection is immune from
civil liability unless the release constitutes gross negligence or
intentional, wanton, or willful misconduct.
(5) (4) The pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer maintains a
record of information for each sale of a nonprescription product
containing pseudoephedrine or ephedrine. Required information
includes:
(A) the name and address of each purchaser;
(B) the type of identification presented;
(C) the governmental entity that issued the identification;
(D) the identification number; and
(E) the ephedrine or pseudoephedrine product purchased,
including the number of grams the product contains and the
date and time of the transaction.
(6) (5) A pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer shall, except as
provided in subdivision (7), (6), before completing a sale of an
over-the-counter product containing pseudoephedrine or
ephedrine, electronically submit the required information to the
National Precursor Log Exchange (NPLEx), electronic logging
system under IC 10-11-13.2, if the NPLEx electronic logging
system is available to pharmacies or NPLEx covered retailers in
the state without a charge for accessing the system. The pharmacy
or NPLEx covered retailer may not complete the sale if the
system generates a stop sale alert, including a stop sale alert for
a person convicted of a drug related felony reported under
IC 33-24-6-3.
(7) (6) If a pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer selling an
over-the-counter product containing ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine experiences mechanical or electronic failure of
the electronic sales tracking system and is unable to comply with
the electronic sales tracking requirement, the pharmacy or NPLEx
covered retailer shall maintain a written log or an alternative
electronic record keeping mechanism until the pharmacy or
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


NPLEx covered retailer is able to comply with the electronic
sales tracking requirement.
(8) (7) The pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer stores the drug
behind a counter in an area inaccessible to a customer or in a
locked display case that makes the drug unavailable to a customer
without the assistance of an employee.
(e) A person may not purchase drugs containing more than:
(1) three and six-tenths (3.6) grams of ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine, or both, on one (1) day;
(2) seven and two-tenths (7.2) grams of ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine, or both, in a thirty (30) day period; or
(3) sixty-one and two-tenths (61.2) grams of ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine, or both, in a three hundred sixty-five (365) day
period.
These limits apply to the total amount of base ephedrine and
pseudoephedrine contained in the products and not to the overall
weight of the products.
(f) If a purchaser does not have a relationship on record with the
pharmacy, as determined by rules adopted by the board under
IC 25-26-13-4, or the pharmacist has made a professional
determination that there is not a legitimate medical or pharmaceutical
need for ephedrine or pseudoephedrine under subsection (d), the
purchaser may, at the pharmacist's discretion, purchase only the
following:
(1) A product that has been determined under section 14.3 of this
chapter to be an extraction resistant or a conversion resistant form
of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine.
(2) A product that contains not more than:
(A) a total of seven hundred twenty (720) milligrams of
ephedrine or pseudoephedrine per package; and
(B) thirty (30) milligrams of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine per
tablet.
The pharmacist may not sell more than one (1) package of
ephedrine or pseudoephedrine to a purchaser under this
subdivision per day.
However, if the pharmacist believes that the ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine purchase will be used to manufacture
methamphetamine, the pharmacist may refuse to sell ephedrine or
pseudoephedrine to the purchaser.
(g) (f) A retail distributor, wholesaler, or manufacturer shall report
a suspicious order to the state police department in writing.
(h) (g) Not later than three (3) days after the discovery of an unusual
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


theft at a particular retail store, the pharmacy or NPLEx covered
retailer shall report the unusual theft to the state police department in
writing. If three (3) unusual thefts occur in a thirty (30) day period at
a particular pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer, the pharmacy or
NPLEx covered retailer shall, for at least one hundred eighty (180)
days after the date of the last unusual theft, locate all drugs containing
ephedrine or pseudoephedrine at that particular pharmacy or NPLEx
covered retailer behind a counter in an area inaccessible to a customer
or in a locked display case that makes the drug unavailable to
customers without the assistance of an employee.
(i) (h) A unit (as defined in IC 36-1-2-23) may not adopt an
ordinance after February 1, 2005, that is more stringent than this
section.
(j) (i) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates this section
commits a Class C misdemeanor. However, the offense is a Class A
misdemeanor if the person has a prior unrelated conviction under this
section.
(k) (j) A pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer that uses the
electronic sales tracking system in accordance with this section is
immune from civil liability for any act or omission committed in
carrying out the duties required by this section, unless the act or
omission was due to recklessness or deliberate or wanton misconduct.
A pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer is immune from liability to a
third party unless the pharmacy or NPLEx covered retailer has violated
a provision of this section and the third party brings an action based on
the pharmacy's or NPLEx covered retailer's violation of this section.
(l) (k) The following requirements apply to the NPLEx: electronic
logging system:
(1) Information contained in the NPLEx electronic logging
system may be shared only with law enforcement officials.
(2) A law enforcement official may access Indiana transaction
information maintained in the NPLEx electronic logging system
for investigative purposes.
(3) NADDI may not modify sales transaction data that is shared
with law enforcement officials.
(4) At least one (1) time per day, Indiana data contained in the
NPLEx electronic logging system for the previous calendar day
shall be forwarded to the state police department.
(m) (l) A person or corporate entity may not mandate a protocol or
procedure that interferes with the pharmacist's ability to exercise the
pharmacist's independent professional judgment under this section.
including whether to deny the sale of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107


under subsection (f).
2026 IN 1399—LS 7065/DI 107